Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.01
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Residential Lead-Based Paint Professions Practice Act, the definitions found in sections 71-6319.02 to 71-6319.40 apply.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1262.